Utah statutes.
19-5-119.   State permits not required where federal government has primary responsibility.

If for any reason, including cessation of federal funding, the federal government has the primary responsibility for the discharge permit or underground injection permit programs in this state, discharge or underground injection permits established by this chapter are not required.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

